Texas, session 892, HB100.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: ARTICLE 1.  DIRECT CASH REBATES TO HOMESTEAD PROPERTY OWNERS. SECTION 1.01.  Rebate of federal reimbursements to homestead property owners. (1)  The comptroller of public accounts shall allocate federal reimbursement funds received for border security and immigration-related costs incurred by the state and reimbursed to the state under Public Law 119-21, also known as the "One Big Beautiful Bill." (2)  From the total amount of federal funds received by the state on or before April 30, 2026, for border security and immigration-related costs, the comptroller shall: (a)  Deduct the minimum amount necessary for administrative and processing expenses, not to exceed $28 million; and (b)  divide the remaining amount by the number of households in the state that have been granted a homestead exemption under Section 11.13, Tax Code, for the most recent tax year on record as of January 1, 2026. (3)  Each qualifying homestead household shall receive a onetime rebate check in the amount calculated under Subsection (2)(b). (4)  The comptroller shall issue and distribute checks to eligible households no later than August 1, 2026. (5)  The rebate is not considered taxable income for purposes of state or federal law and shall not affect eligibility for any state-administered benefits. ARTICLE 2.  Any federal reimbursement funds received by the State of Texas under Public Law 119-21, received on or after May 1, 2026, for border security or immigration-related costs shall be deposited into the state treasury and appropriated solely for the purpose of school district property tax rate compression, as defined by Section 48.2551, Education Code. ARTICLE 3.  This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.